Georgia, session 2025_26, HB264.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to income taxes,
is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-20, relating to individual tax
rates, credit for withholding and other payments, and applicability to estates and trusts, as
follows:
"(a)(1) A tax is imposed upon every resident of this state with respect to the Georgia
taxable net income of the taxpayer as defined in Code Section 48-7-27; provided,
however, that for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2025, no such tax is
imposed on any resident of this state who has reached the age of 100 or older prior to
January 1 of such taxable year.
(2) A tax is imposed upon every nonresident with respect to such nonresident's Georgia
taxable net income not otherwise exempted which is received by the taxpayer from
H. B. 264
- 1 -

LC 50 1001
services performed, property owned, proceeds of any lottery prize awarded by the
Georgia Lottery Corporation, or from business carried on in this state.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the tax imposed by this subsection shall
be levied, collected, and paid annually."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 264
- 2 -